Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 2. Operation; Equipment

§ 41-13-201.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from 1963, ch. 50, § 1, provided definitions.

§ 41-13-202.
Provisions applicable to all watercraft in state; supplemental to federal laws and regulations.

The provisions of this act shall be applicable to all watercraft operating on all of the waterways of this state. The provisions of this act shall be construed to supplement federal laws and regulations when not expressly inconsistent therewith on all waterways where such federal laws and regulations are applicable.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.13.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 41-13-101(a)(ix).

§ 41-13-203.
Careless operation defined.

Any person who operates any watercraft in a careless or heedless manner so as to be indifferent to the person or property of another person, or at a rate of speed greater than will permit him in the exercise of reasonable care to bring the watercraft to a stop within the assured clear distance ahead, is guilty of the crime of careless operation.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.14; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1; 1997, ch. 97, § 1.

§ 41-13-204.
Reckless operation defined.

Any person who shall operate any watercraft in such a manner as to endanger the life or limb, or damage the property of, another person, shall be guilty of the crime of reckless operation.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.15; 1997, ch. 97, § 1.

§ 41-13-205.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 5, related to negligent homicide.

§ 41-13-206.
Operation of watercraft by intoxicated or drugged person prohibited.

As used in this section:

“Alcohol concentration” means as defined in W.S. 31-5-233(a)(i);

“Controlled substance” includes:

Any drug or substance defined by W.S. 35-7-1002(a)(iv);

Any glue, aerosol or other toxic vapor which when intentionally inhaled or sniffed results in impairment of an individual’s ability to safely operate a watercraft.

No owner of any watercraft or person having charge or control of a watercraft shall authorize or knowingly permit it to be operated by any person who is under the influence of alcohol, a controlled substance or combination thereof in violation of subsection (c) of this section.

No person shall operate or be in actual physical control of a watercraft if the person:

To a degree which renders him incapable of safely operating a watercraft:

Is under the influence of alcohol;

Is under the influence of a controlled substance; or

Is under the influence of a combination of the elements named in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph.

Has an alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) or more if the watercraft is a motorboat.

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 87, § 3.

In any criminal prosecution for a violation of this section relating to operating or being in actual physical control of a watercraft while under the influence of alcohol, the amount of alcohol in the defendant’s blood at the time alleged as shown by chemical analysis of the defendant’s blood, urine, breath or other bodily substance shall give rise to the following presumptions:

If there was at that time an alcohol concentration of five one-hundredths of one percent (0.05%) or less, it shall be presumed that the defendant was not under the influence of alcohol;

If there was at that time an alcohol concentration of more than five one-hundredths of one percent (0.05%) and less than eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) if the watercraft is a motorboat, that fact shall not give rise to any presumption that the defendant was or was not under the influence of alcohol, but it may be considered with other competent evidence in determining the guilt or innocence of the defendant.

Nothing in subsection (d) of this section shall be construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the question of whether or not the defendant was under the influence of alcohol. The fact that any person charged with a violation of subsection (c) of this section is or has been entitled to use the controlled substance under the laws of this state shall not constitute a defense against any charge under this section. It is an affirmative defense to a violation of paragraph (c)(iii) of this section that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of actual operation or physical control of a watercraft and before the administration of the evidentiary test to cause the defendant’s alcohol concentration to exceed eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) if the watercraft is a motorboat, but evidence of the consumption may not be admitted unless notice is given to the prosecution pursuant to Rule 12.1 of the Wyoming Rules of Criminal Procedure.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 119, § 3.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a violation of the Wyoming controlled substances act.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.17; Laws 1987, ch. 177, § 2; 1989, ch. 119, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2019 ch. 152, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 87, §§ 1, 3, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

in (e), substituted “Rule 12.1” for “Rule 16.1.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130,§ 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (c)(ii), substituted "eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) or more if the watercraft is a motorboat" for "ten one-hundredths of one percent (0.10%) or more," in (c)(iii), substituted "eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) or more if the watercraft is a motorboat" for "ten one-hundredths of one percent (0.10%) or more as measured within three (3) hours of the time of operation or actual physical control"; in (d)(ii) and (e), substituted "eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) if the watercraft is a motorboat" for "ten one-hundredths of one percent (0.10%)"; and in (e), deleted "including tests obtained more than three (3) hours after the alleged violation" from the first sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (c)(ii) made a related change; and repealed (c)(iii), which read “Has an alcohol concentration of eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) or more if the watercraft is a motorboat.”

Wyoming Controlled Substances Act. —

See §§

35-7-1001

, 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 41-13-207.
Operation of watercraft by person under disability prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for the owner of any watercraft or any person having such in charge or in control to authorize or knowingly permit the same to be operated by any person who by reason of physical or mental disability is incapable of operating such watercraft under the prevailing circumstances.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.18.

§ 41-13-208.
Overloading prohibited.

Watercraft shall not be loaded with passengers or cargo beyond its safe carrying capacity as stated on the capacity plate and affixed to the watercraft by the manufacturer, taking into consideration weather and other existing operating conditions. Capacity plates shall not be removed or altered.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.19; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1; 2001, ch. 85, § 2.

§ 41-13-209.
Overpowered watercraft prohibited; horsepower rating plates; mufflers required.

No watercraft shall be equipped with any motor or other propulsion machinery that has a horsepower rating exceeding the maximum stated on the capacity plate approved and issued by the United States coast guard and affixed to the watercraft by the manufacturer.

Motorboats shall be equipped, maintained and operated to prevent excessive or unusually loud noise and shall at all times be equipped with a muffler or shall use another method of noise suppression in good working order and in constant operation. No person shall operate or allow the operation of any motorboat equipped with an altered muffler or muffler cutout, bypass or other devise designed or installed to continually or intermittently bypass or otherwise reduce or eliminate the effectiveness of any muffler or muffler system.

Subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to motorboats competing in or while on trials of an approved race or regatta nor in areas designated by the game and fish department.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.20; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1; 1985, ch. 70, § 1; 2001, ch. 85, § 2.

§ 41-13-210.
Riding on gunwales or bow decking prohibited; exceptions.

No person operating a motorboat shall allow any person to ride or sit on either the starboard or port gunwales thereof or on the decking over the bow of the vessel while underway unless such motorboat is provided with adequate guards or railing to prevent passengers from being lost overboard. Nothing in this section shall be construed to mean that passengers or other persons aboard a motorboat cannot occupy the decking over the bow of the boat to moor the watercraft to a mooring buoy or to cast off from such a buoy, or for any other necessary purpose.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.21; Laws 1987, ch. 177, § 2.

§ 41-13-211.
Buoys and markers; operation in marked restricted areas prohibited; exceptions.

The commission shall regulate the type and use of watercraft on the waters of the state and the placement of buoys, markers or regulatory signs necessary to provide for the safety and welfare of the public. Watercraft operators shall operate watercraft in accordance with restrictions and regulations specified on the buoys, markers or signs. No waterway marker regulating watercraft use shall be placed on, in or near the waters of the state unless approval has been obtained in accordance with commission regulations.

No person shall operate a watercraft on any water or within a water area which has been designated in accordance with commission regulation as a restricted area. This section does not apply in the case of an emergency, or to patrol or rescue craft.

No person shall tie-off, moor or attach any watercraft to any regulatory buoy or waterway marking device.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.22; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1; 1987, ch. 177, § 2; 2001, ch. 85, § 2.

§ 41-13-212.
Motorboat pulling skier to be occupied by at least 2 persons; hours of operation; use of care; exceptions.

No motorboat which shall have in tow or shall be otherwise assisting a person on water skis, aquaplane or similar contrivance, shall be operated or propelled in or upon any waterway, unless such motorboat shall be occupied by at least two (2) persons. Provided, that this subsection shall not apply to motorboats used by representatives of duly constituted water ski schools in the giving of instruction, or to motorboats used in duly authorized water ski tournaments, competitions, expositions, or trials therefor, or to any motorboat equipped with a wide angle rear view mirror.

No motorboat shall have in tow or shall otherwise be assisting a person on water skis, aquaplane or similar contrivance from the period of one (1) hour after sunset to one (1) hour prior to sunrise. Provided, that this subsection shall not apply to motorboats used in duly authorized water ski tournaments, competitions, expositions, or trials therefor.

All motorboats having in tow or otherwise assisting a person on water skis, aquaplane or similar contrivance, shall be operated in a careful and prudent manner at a reasonable distance from persons and property so as not to endanger the life or property of any person.

No person shall operate or manipulate any vessel, tow rope or other device by which the direction or location of water skis, aquaplane, or similar device may be affected or controlled in such a way as to cause the water skis, aquaplane, or similar device, or any person thereon to collide with or strike against any person or object, other than a jumping ramp or in conjunction with skiing over a slalom course.

The person required to be in a motorboat under subsection (a) of this section who is not operating the motorboat shall:

Continuously observe the person being towed.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.23; Laws 1987, ch. 177, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (e)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-13-213.
Safety equipment required.

All watercraft shall carry or be equipped with safety equipment as prescribed by commission regulation. The commission may also require every person riding on watercraft operating on specified waters to wear commission approved safety equipment.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.24; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1.

§ 41-13-214.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 14, related to requirements for fire extinguishers.

§ 41-13-215.
Enforcement.

The game and fish department law enforcement officers and any other peace officers of the state or any of its political subdivisions otherwise authorized by law may enforce this act and rules and regulations of the commission.

For purposes of this section, any game and fish department law enforcement officer and any other peace officer may:

Stop, halt, inspect or board any watercraft;

If there is probable cause to believe a watercraft and associated trailer are stolen, seize the watercraft and associated trailer. A defaced, altered, removed or destroyed vessel hull identification number (HIN) is prima facia evidence that the watercraft and trailer are stolen.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.26; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1; 2001, ch. 85, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 41-13-101(a)(ix).

§ 41-13-216.
Penalties for violations; suspension of privilege to operate; operating while privilege suspended.

Any person who violates or fails to comply with W.S.

41-13-207

through

41-13-212

,

41-13-219

or 41-13-220(b) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200.00), imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both, and may be refused the privilege of operating any watercraft on any of the waterways of this state for not more than two (2) years. Any person who violates W.S.

41-13-105

, 41-13-111(a) or (b),

41-13-203

,

41-13-204

,

41-13-206

or 41-13-220(a) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both, and may be refused the privilege of operating any watercraft on any of the waterways of this state for not more than two (2) years.

Any person who violates or fails to comply with any provision of this act for which no separate penalty is provided or a valid rule or regulation of the commission is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00).

Any person who operates any watercraft during the period when he has been denied this privilege under subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or both, and may be refused the privilege of operating any watercraft on any of the waterways of this state for not more than two (2) years.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.27; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1; 1987, ch. 177, § 2; 1997, ch. 97, § 1; 2001, ch. 85, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 41-13-101(a)(ix).

§ 41-13-217.
Races or regattas.

The commission may regulate the holding of regattas, motorboat or other boat races, marine parades, tournaments or exhibitions. It shall adopt regulations concerning the safety of motorboats and other vessels and persons thereon, either observers or participants. Whenever a regatta, motorboat or other boat race, tournament or exhibition is proposed to be held, the person in charge, at least thirty (30) days prior thereto, shall file an application with the department for permission to hold the regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine events, tournament or exhibition. The application shall set forth the date, time and location of the proposed event and such other information as the commission may by regulation require.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.28; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state or local enactments regulating parades, 80 ALR5th 255.

§ 41-13-218.
Regulations.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 50, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 41-528.29; Laws 1979, ch. 112, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 41-13-101(a)(ix).

§ 41-13-219.
Age of operator of motorboat.

No person shall operate or be in actual physical control of a motorboat required to be numbered on the waters in this state unless he is at least sixteen (16) years of age or is accompanied by an adult. No person shall knowingly permit the operation of a numbered motorboat on the waters of this state by a person under sixteen (16) years of age who is not accompanied by an adult.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 177, § 1; 2001, ch. 85, § 2.

Cited in

Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014).

§ 41-13-220.
Eluding an officer; emergency watercraft equipment restricted.

Any person operating a watercraft shall upon observing a visual or hearing an audible signal from a law enforcement officer enforcing this act and rules and regulations of the commission, bring the watercraft to an immediate stop. No person, after observing a visual or hearing an audible signal from a law enforcement officer enforcing this act and rules and regulations of the commission, shall attempt to elude a law enforcement officer by watercraft or any other means.

Red or blue rotating or flashing lights shall not be displayed and sirens shall not be used on watercraft except as authorized for watercraft operated or used by law enforcement and emergency watercraft.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 85, § 1.